Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.120

Disciplinary action—Additional grounds.

A licensee or interim permit holder under this chapter may also be subject to disciplinary action if the licensee or interim permit holder:

(1) Is found guilty in any court of any crime involving forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, larceny, extortion, or conspiracy to defraud and ten years have not elapsed since the date of the conviction; or

(2) Has a judgment entered against him or her in any civil action involving forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, larceny, extortion, or conspiracy to defraud and five years have not elapsed since the date of the entry of the final judgment in the action, but a license shall not be issued unless the judgment debt has been discharged; or

(3) Has a judgment entered against him or her under chapter 19.86 RCW and two years have not elapsed since the entry of the final judgment; but a license shall not be issued unless there has been full compliance with the terms of such judgment, if any. The judgment shall not be grounds for denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a license unless the judgment arises out of and is based on acts of the applicant, licensee, or employee of the licensee; or

(4) Commits unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW 18.130.180 of the uniform disciplinary act.

[ 2002 c 310 s 13; 1998 c 142 s 9; 1996 c 200 s 17; 1983 c 39 s 10; 1973 1st ex.s. c 106 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Penalties authorized: RCW 18.35.161.